Illinois, session 104th, SB3989.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Light 5Detection and Ranging Technology Security Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The General Assembly finds that:7    (1) The enactment of the Light Detection and Ranging 8Technology Security Act will protect State critical 9infrastructure and national security by ensuring that Illinois 10incorporates safe LIDAR systems produced by America and by 11friendly nations into State critical infrastructure and other 12State procurements.13    (2) This Act sets as policy that Illinois will not 14purchase LIDAR systems, either directly or indirectly, that 15are produced by companies from countries of concern. 16    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:17    "Autonomous vehicles" means any vehicle equipped with an 18automated driving system, or the hardware and software that 19are collectively capable of performing part or all of the 20dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of 21whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain.22    "Country of concern" means the People's Republic of China,   SB3989- 2 -LRB104 20637 AAS 34133 b1the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the 2Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic of Cuba, 3or any other entity deemed by the Governor in consultation 4with the Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 5and Office of Homeland Security (IEMA-OHS).6    "Domicile" means the country in which a company is 7registered, where the company's affairs are primarily 8completed, or where the majority of ownership share is held.9    "LIDAR" or "light detection and ranging" means a remote 10sensing method using the emission of laser light, often 11through pulsed lasers, to detect and measure the range of 12surrounding objects, often for the purpose of producing 13real-time, high-resolution 3-dimensional maps of the physical 14environment surrounding the device that applies the LIDAR 15technology. For purposes of this Act, "LIDAR" or "light 16detection and ranging" includes devices that are commonly used 17in, but not limited to, automation and smart infrastructure 18applications, including, but not limited to, automated 19vehicles, drones, port cranes, drawbridges, traffic signals, 20and security systems at airports and other sensitive sites. 21    "Operational design domain" means operating conditions 22under which a given autonomous vehicle or feature thereof is 23specifically designed to function, including, but not limited 24to, environmental, geographical, or time-of-day restrictions, 25and the requisite presence or absence of certain traffic or 26roadway characteristics.  SB3989- 3 -LRB104 20637 AAS 34133 b1    "State infrastructure" means State critical infrastructure 2and State transportation infrastructure. 3    "State critical infrastructure" includes, but is not 4limited to, systems and assets, whether physical or virtual, 5so vital to Illinois or the United States of America that the 6incapacity or destruction of such systems and assets would 7have a debilitating impact on State or national security, 8State or national economic security, State or national public 9health, or any combination of those matters. "State critical 10infrastructure" may be publicly or privately owned, and 11includes, but is not limited to:12        (1) gas and oil production, storage, or delivery 13    systems;14        (2) water supply, refinement, storage, or delivery 15    systems;16        (3) telecommunications networks;17        (4) electrical power delivery systems;18        (5) emergency services;19        (6) transportation systems and services; or20        (7) personal data or otherwise classified information 21    storage systems, including cybersecurity. 22    "State transportation infrastructure" includes, but is not 23limited to:24        (1) airports, including, but not limited to, 25    commercial and intermodal airports and heliports; and all 26    airport infrastructure;  SB3989- 4 -LRB104 20637 AAS 34133 b1        (2) roadways, including, but not limited to, publicly 2    accessible streets, roads, highways, and bridges; and all 3    roadway infrastructure, including, but not limited to, 4    signage, toll booths, weigh stations, and traffic signals;5        (3) railways, including, but not limited to, all 6    classes of freight rail and passenger rail; and all 7    railway infrastructure, including, but not limited to, 8    intermodal rail yards and signals;9        (4) ports, including but not limited to, inland ports, 10    seaports, deepwater ports, inland waterways, and levees; 11    and all port infrastructure, including, but not limited 12    to, intermodal stations; or13        (5) public transit, including bus, ferry, cable car, 14    tram, trolley, and other types of publicly accessible 15    transportation; and all public transit infrastructure. 16    Section 15. Secure LIDAR for State infrastructure. 17    (a) All State infrastructure located within or serving 18Illinois shall be constructed so as not to include any LIDAR 19equipment manufactured in or by, including any equipment whose 20critical or necessary components are manufactured in or by, a 21company domiciled within a country of concern or a company 22owned by a company domiciled in a country of concern.23    (b) All State infrastructure in operation within or 24serving Illinois, including any covered infrastructure that is 25not permanently disabled, that contains LIDAR equipment   SB3989- 5 -LRB104 20637 AAS 34133 b1prohibited by subsection (a) shall be removed and replaced 2with LIDAR equipment that is not prohibited by subsection (a) 3within 90 days after the effective date of this Act.4    (c) An agency, private entity, or political subdivision 5primarily responsible for any covered infrastructure that 6includes prohibited LIDAR equipment may request a 7reimbursement up to the cost of the original purchase price of 8such prohibited LIDAR equipment from the State Comptroller, 9provided the request includes purchase orders and is submitted 10within 90 days after the effective date of this Act. No 11procurement made by the State government or a political 12subdivision of the State government can include LIDAR 13equipment manufactured in or by, including any equipment whose 14critical or necessary components are manufactured in or by, a 15company domiciled within a country of concern or a company 16owned by a company domiciled in a country of concern. 17    Section 20. Autonomous vehicle prohibitions.18    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no State 19procurement or procurement made by any political subdivision 20of the State may include the purchase of LIDAR equipment 21manufactured in or by, including any equipment whose critical 22or necessary components are manufactured in or by, a company 23domiciled within a country of concern or a company owned by a 24company domiciled within a country of concern.25    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and   SB3989- 6 -LRB104 20637 AAS 34133 b1all certifications, licenses, and regulatory approvals 2concerning the approval, usage, or operation of autonomous 3vehicles in this State shall require a prohibition upon the 4installation or usage of LIDAR equipment manufactured in or 5by, including any equipment whose critical or necessary 6components are manufactured in or by, a company domiciled 7within a country of concern or a company owned by a company 8domiciled within a country of concern on an autonomous vehicle 9registered for use in this State. 10    Section 25. Enforcement date. This Act is fully 11enforceable as of 90 days after the effective date of this Act. 12    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 13severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.